Hawaii, session 2025, GM1289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. (a) The department of land and natural
resources shall establish a Keauhou aquifer system monitoring
pilot project.
(b) Under the pilot project, the commission on water
resource management, in collaboration with other agencies,
shall:
(1) Collect data from the monitoring wells installed in
the Keauhou aquifer system;
(2) Monitor groundwater levels in the Keauhou aquifer
system;
(3) Conduct water salinity tests in the Keauhou aquifer
system;
(4) Monitor the impacts of groundwater pumping on the
health of coastal ecosystems and traditional and
customary practices within the Keauhou aquifer system;
(5) Initiate public information meetings to report on the
data collected;
2025-2797 SB1602 CDl SMA-l.docx
llllllllilllllllllllMlliilWillllllll

Page 2
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(6) Conduct community outreach to guide the management of
groundwater resources in the Keauhou aquifer system;
(7) Integrate new and existing studies and research into a
plan for the responsible management of groundwater
resources in the Keauhou aquifer system; and
(8) Conduct other related activities as the department
deems necessary to carry out the purpose of the pilot
project.
(c) The department of land and natural resources shall
submit an interim report to the legislature every six months,
detailing, at minimum, groundwater levels and water salinity
analysis in the Keauhou aquifer system.
SECTION 2. Based on the department of land and natural
resources' assessment of the Keauhou aquifer system monitoring
pilot project, the department shall determine whether to
continue, expand, or end the pilot project.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $200,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2025-2797 SB1602 CDl SMA-l.docx
■iiiininniwiiiiiHiiiiiiini

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
2026-2027 for the Keauhou aquifer system monitoring pilot
project.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-2797 SB1602 CDl SMA-l.docx


1602
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 6th day of June ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI

S.B. No. 1602, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
resident of urc Senate
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1602, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives